data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8182 Y 2
SFX 8182 ėsti ėtė/551 . 350
SFX 8182 ėstis ėtėsi/551 . 350

SFX 8183 Y 2
SFX 8183 ėsti ėtė/552 . 350
SFX 8183 ėstis ėtėsi/552 . 350

SFX 8184 Y 2
SFX 8184 ėsti ėtė/553 . 350
SFX 8184 ėstis ėtėsi/553 . 350

SFX 8188 Y 2
SFX 8188 sti sti/530 . 348
SFX 8188 stis stis/530 . 348

SFX 8189 Y 2
SFX 8189 sti sti/531 . 348
SFX 8189 stis stis/531 . 348

SFX 8190 Y 2
SFX 8190 sti sti/532 . 348
SFX 8190 stis stis/532 . 348

SFX 8191 Y 2
SFX 8191 sti sti/533 . 348
SFX 8191 stis stis/533 . 348

SFX 8192 Y 2
SFX 8192 sti sti/534 . 348
SFX 8192 stis stis/534 . 348

SFX 8193 Y 2
SFX 8193 sti sti/535 . 348
SFX 8193 stis stis/535 . 348

SFX 8194 Y 2
SFX 8194 sti sti/536 . 348
SFX 8194 stis stis/536 . 348

SFX 8195 Y 2
SFX 8195 sti sti/537 . 348
SFX 8195 stis stis/537 . 348

SFX 8196 Y 2
SFX 8196 sti sti/538 . 348
SFX 8196 stis stis/538 . 348

SFX 8197 Y 2
SFX 8197 sti sti/539 . 348
SFX 8197 stis stis/539 . 348

SFX 8208 Y 2
SFX 8208 sti ta/540 . 349
SFX 8208 stis tasi/540 . 349

SFX 8209 Y 2
SFX 8209 sti ta/541 . 349
SFX 8209 stis tasi/541 . 349

SFX 8210 Y 2
SFX 8210 sti ta/542 . 349
SFX 8210 stis tasi/542 . 349

SFX 8211 Y 2
SFX 8211 sti ta/543 . 349
SFX 8211 stis tasi/543 . 349

SFX 8212 Y 2
SFX 8212 sti ta/544 . 349
SFX 8212 stis tasi/544 . 349

SFX 8213 Y 2
SFX 8213 sti ta/545 . 349
SFX 8213 stis tasi/545 . 349

SFX 8214 Y 2
SFX 8214 sti ta/546 . 349
SFX 8214 stis tasi/546 . 349

SFX 8215 Y 2
SFX 8215 sti ta/547 . 349
SFX 8215 stis tasi/547 . 349

SFX 8216 Y 2
SFX 8216 sti ta/548 . 349
SFX 8216 stis tasi/548 . 349

SFX 8226 Y 1
SFX 8226 sti tie/549 . 349

SFX 8227 Y 1
SFX 8227 stis tie/550 . 349

SFX 8228 Y 2
SFX 8228 sti to/551 . 350
SFX 8228 stis tosi/551 . 350

SFX 8229 Y 2
SFX 8229 sti to/552 . 350
SFX 8229 stis tosi/552 . 350

SFX 8230 Y 2
SFX 8230 sti to/553 . 350
SFX 8230 stis tosi/553 . 350

SFX 8234 Y 2
SFX 8234 ižti ižti/530 . 348
SFX 8234 ižtis ižtis/530 . 348

SFX 8235 Y 2
SFX 8235 ižti ižti/531 . 348
SFX 8235 ižtis ižtis/531 . 348

SFX 8236 Y 2
SFX 8236 ižti ižti/532 . 348
SFX 8236 ižtis ižtis/532 . 348

SFX 8237 Y 2
SFX 8237 ižti ižti/533 . 348
SFX 8237 ižtis ižtis/533 . 348

SFX 8238 Y 2
SFX 8238 ižti ižti/534 . 348
SFX 8238 ižtis ižtis/534 . 348

SFX 8239 Y 2
SFX 8239 ižti ižti/535 . 348
SFX 8239 ižtis ižtis/535 . 348

SFX 8240 Y 2
SFX 8240 ižti ižti/536 . 348
SFX 8240 ižtis ižtis/536 . 348

SFX 8241 Y 2
SFX 8241 ižti ižti/537 . 348
SFX 8241 ižtis ižtis/537 . 348

SFX 8242 Y 2
SFX 8242 ižti ižti/538 . 348
SFX 8242 ižtis ižtis/538 . 348

SFX 8243 Y 2
SFX 8243 ižti ižti/539 . 348
SFX 8243 ižtis ižtis/539 . 348

SFX 8254 Y 2
SFX 8254 ižti yžta/540 . 349
SFX 8254 ižtis yžtasi/540 . 349

SFX 8255 Y 2
SFX 8255 ižti yžta/541 . 349
SFX 8255 ižtis yžtasi/541 . 349

SFX 8256 Y 2
SFX 8256 ižti yžta/542 . 349
SFX 8256 ižtis yžtasi/542 . 349

SFX 8257 Y 2
SFX 8257 ižti yžta/543 . 349
SFX 8257 ižtis yžtasi/543 . 349

SFX 8258 Y 2
SFX 8258 ižti yžta/544 . 349
SFX 8258 ižtis yžtasi/544 . 349

SFX 8259 Y 2
SFX 8259 ižti yžta/545 . 349
SFX 8259 ižtis yžtasi/545 . 349

SFX 8260 Y 2
SFX 8260 ižti yžta/546 . 349
SFX 8260 ižtis yžtasi/546 . 349

SFX 8261 Y 2
SFX 8261 ižti yžta/547 . 349
SFX 8261 ižtis yžtasi/547 . 349

SFX 8262 Y 2
SFX 8262 ižti yžta/548 . 349
SFX 8262 ižtis yžtasi/548 . 349

SFX 8272 Y 1
SFX 8272 ižti yžtie/549 . 349

SFX 8273 Y 1
SFX 8273 ižtis yžtie/550 . 349

SFX 8274 Y 2
SFX 8274 ižti ižo/551 . 350
SFX 8274 ižtis ižosi/551 . 350

SFX 8275 Y 2
SFX 8275 ižti ižo/552 . 350
SFX 8275 ižtis ižosi/552 . 350

SFX 8276 Y 2
SFX 8276 ižti ižo/553 . 350
SFX 8276 ižtis ižosi/553 . 350

SFX 8280 Y 2
SFX 8280 oti oti/530 . 348
SFX 8280 otis otis/530 . 348

SFX 8281 Y 2
SFX 8281 oti oti/531 . 348
SFX 8281 otis otis/531 . 348

SFX 8282 Y 2
SFX 8282 oti oti/532 . 348
SFX 8282 otis otis/532 . 348

SFX 8283 Y 2
SFX 8283 oti oti/533 . 348
SFX 8283 otis otis/533 . 348

SFX 8284 Y 2
SFX 8284 oti oti/534 . 348
SFX 8284 otis otis/534 . 348

SFX 8285 Y 2
SFX 8285 oti oti/535 . 348
SFX 8285 otis otis/535 . 348

SFX 8286 Y 2
SFX 8286 oti oti/536 . 348
SFX 8286 otis otis/536 . 348

SFX 8287 Y 2
SFX 8287 oti oti/537 . 348
SFX 8287 otis otis/537 . 348

SFX 8288 Y 2
SFX 8288 oti oti/538 . 348
SFX 8288 otis otis/538 . 348

SFX 8289 Y 2
SFX 8289 oti oti/539 . 348
SFX 8289 otis otis/539 . 348

SFX 8300 Y 2
SFX 8300 oti a/540 . 349
SFX 8300 otis asi/540 . 349

SFX 8301 Y 2
SFX 8301 oti a/541 . 349
SFX 8301 otis asi/541 . 349

SFX 8302 Y 2
SFX 8302 oti a/542 . 349
SFX 8302 otis asi/542 . 349

SFX 8303 Y 2
SFX 8303 oti a/543 . 349
SFX 8303 otis asi/543 . 349

SFX 8304 Y 2
SFX 8304 oti a/544 . 349
SFX 8304 otis asi/544 . 349

SFX 8305 Y 2
SFX 8305 oti a/545 . 349
SFX 8305 otis asi/545 . 349

SFX 8306 Y 2
SFX 8306 oti a/546 . 349
SFX 8306 otis asi/546 . 349

SFX 8307 Y 2
SFX 8307 oti a/547 . 349
SFX 8307 otis asi/547 . 349

SFX 8308 Y 2
SFX 8308 oti a/548 . 349
SFX 8308 otis asi/548 . 349

SFX 8318 Y 1
SFX 8318 oti ie/549 . 349

SFX 8319 Y 1
SFX 8319 otis ie/550 . 349

SFX 8320 Y 2
SFX 8320 oti ojo/551 . 350
SFX 8320 otis ojosi/551 . 350

SFX 8321 Y 2
SFX 8321 oti ojo/552 . 350
SFX 8321 otis ojosi/552 . 350

SFX 8322 Y 2
SFX 8322 oti ojo/553 . 350
SFX 8322 otis ojosi/553 . 350

SFX 8326 Y 2
SFX 8326 usti usti/530 . 348
SFX 8326 ustis ustis/530 . 348

SFX 8327 Y 2
SFX 8327 usti usti/531 . 348
SFX 8327 ustis ustis/531 . 348

SFX 8328 Y 2
SFX 8328 usti usti/532 . 348
SFX 8328 ustis ustis/532 . 348

SFX 8329 Y 2
SFX 8329 usti usti/533 . 348
SFX 8329 ustis ustis/533 . 348

SFX 8330 Y 2
SFX 8330 usti usti/534 . 348
SFX 8330 ustis ustis/534 . 348

SFX 8331 Y 2
SFX 8331 usti usti/535 . 348
SFX 8331 ustis ustis/535 . 348

SFX 8332 Y 2
SFX 8332 usti usti/536 . 348
SFX 8332 ustis ustis/536 . 348

SFX 8333 Y 2
SFX 8333 usti usti/537 . 348
SFX 8333 ustis ustis/537 . 348

SFX 8334 Y 2
SFX 8334 usti usti/538 . 348
SFX 8334 ustis ustis/538 . 348

SFX 8335 Y 2
SFX 8335 usti usti/539 . 348
SFX 8335 ustis ustis/539 . 348

SFX 8346 Y 2
SFX 8346 usti ūsta/540 . 349
SFX 8346 ustis ūstasi/540 . 349

SFX 8347 Y 2
SFX 8347 usti ūsta/541 . 349
SFX 8347 ustis ūstasi/541 . 349

SFX 8348 Y 2
SFX 8348 usti ūsta/542 . 349
SFX 8348 ustis ūstasi/542 . 349

SFX 8349 Y 2
SFX 8349 usti ūsta/543 . 349
SFX 8349 ustis ūstasi/543 . 349

SFX 8350 Y 2
SFX 8350 usti ūsta/544 . 349
SFX 8350 ustis ūstasi/544 . 349

SFX 8351 Y 2
SFX 8351 usti ūsta/545 . 349
SFX 8351 ustis ūstasi/545 . 349

SFX 8352 Y 2
SFX 8352 usti ūsta/546 . 349
SFX 8352 ustis ūstasi/546 . 349

SFX 8353 Y 2
SFX 8353 usti ūsta/547 . 349
SFX 8353 ustis ūstasi/547 . 349

SFX 8354 Y 2
SFX 8354 usti ūsta/548 . 349
SFX 8354 ustis ūstasi/548 . 349

SFX 8364 Y 1
SFX 8364 usti ūstie/549 . 349

SFX 8365 Y 1
SFX 8365 ustis ūstie/550 . 349

SFX 8366 Y 2
SFX 8366 usti uso/551 . 350
SFX 8366 ustis usosi/551 . 350

SFX 8367 Y 2
SFX 8367 usti uso/552 . 350
SFX 8367 ustis usosi/552 . 350

SFX 8368 Y 2
SFX 8368 usti uso/553 . 350
SFX 8368 ustis usosi/553 . 350

SFX 8372 Y 2
SFX 8372 ąsti ąsti/530 . 348
SFX 8372 ąstis ąstis/530 . 348

SFX 8373 Y 2
SFX 8373 ąsti ąsti/531 . 348
SFX 8373 ąstis ąstis/531 . 348

SFX 8374 Y 2
SFX 8374 ąsti ąsti/532 . 348
SFX 8374 ąstis ąstis/532 . 348

SFX 8375 Y 2
SFX 8375 ąsti ąsti/533 . 348
SFX 8375 ąstis ąstis/533 . 348

SFX 8376 Y 2
SFX 8376 ąsti ąsti/534 . 348
SFX 8376 ąstis ąstis/534 . 348

SFX 8377 Y 2
SFX 8377 ąsti ąsti/535 . 348
SFX 8377 ąstis ąstis/535 . 348

SFX 8378 Y 2
SFX 8378 ąsti ąsti/536 . 348
SFX 8378 ąstis ąstis/536 . 348

SFX 8379 Y 2
SFX 8379 ąsti ąsti/537 . 348
SFX 8379 ąstis ąstis/537 . 348

SFX 8380 Y 2
SFX 8380 ąsti ąsti/538 . 348
SFX 8380 ąstis ąstis/538 . 348

SFX 8381 Y 2
SFX 8381 ąsti ąsti/539 . 348
SFX 8381 ąstis ąstis/539 . 348

SFX 8392 Y 2
SFX 8392 ąsti anda/540 . 349
SFX 8392 ąstis andasi/540 . 349

SFX 8393 Y 2
SFX 8393 ąsti anda/541 . 349
SFX 8393 ąstis andasi/541 . 349

SFX 8394 Y 2
SFX 8394 ąsti anda/542 . 349
SFX 8394 ąstis andasi/542 . 349

SFX 8395 Y 2
SFX 8395 ąsti anda/543 . 349
SFX 8395 ąstis andasi/543 . 349

SFX 8396 Y 2
SFX 8396 ąsti anda/544 . 349
SFX 8396 ąstis andasi/544 . 349

SFX 8397 Y 2
SFX 8397 ąsti anda/545 . 349
SFX 8397 ąstis andasi/545 . 349

SFX 8398 Y 2
SFX 8398 ąsti anda/546 . 349
SFX 8398 ąstis andasi/546 . 349

SFX 8399 Y 2
SFX 8399 ąsti anda/547 . 349
SFX 8399 ąstis andasi/547 . 349

SFX 8400 Y 2
SFX 8400 ąsti anda/548 . 349
SFX 8400 ąstis andasi/548 . 349

SFX 8410 Y 1
SFX 8410 ąsti andie/549 . 349

SFX 8411 Y 1
SFX 8411 ąstis andie/550 . 349

SFX 8412 Y 2
SFX 8412 ąsti ando/551 . 350
SFX 8412 ąstis andosi/551 . 350

SFX 8413 Y 2
SFX 8413 ąsti ando/552 . 350
SFX 8413 ąstis andosi/552 . 350

SFX 8414 Y 2
SFX 8414 ąsti ando/553 . 350
SFX 8414 ąstis andosi/553 . 350

SFX 8418 Y 2
SFX 8418 ėkti ėkti/530 . 348
SFX 8418 ėktis ėktis/530 . 348

SFX 8419 Y 2
SFX 8419 ėkti ėkti/531 . 348
SFX 8419 ėktis ėktis/531 . 348

SFX 8420 Y 2
SFX 8420 ėkti ėkti/532 . 348
SFX 8420 ėktis ėktis/532 . 348

SFX 8421 Y 2
SFX 8421 ėkti ėkti/533 . 348
SFX 8421 ėktis ėktis/533 . 348

SFX 8422 Y 2
SFX 8422 ėkti ėkti/534 . 348
SFX 8422 ėktis ėktis/534 . 348

SFX 8423 Y 2
SFX 8423 ėkti ėkti/535 . 348
SFX 8423 ėktis ėktis/535 . 348

SFX 8424 Y 2
SFX 8424 ėkti ėkti/536 . 348
SFX 8424 ėktis ėktis/536 . 348

SFX 8425 Y 2
SFX 8425 ėkti ėkti/537 . 348
SFX 8425 ėktis ėktis/537 . 348

SFX 8426 Y 2
SFX 8426 ėkti ėkti/538 . 348
SFX 8426 ėktis ėktis/538 . 348

SFX 8427 Y 2
SFX 8427 ėkti ėkti/539 . 348
SFX 8427 ėktis ėktis/539 . 348

SFX 8438 Y 2
SFX 8438 ėkti ekia/540 . 349
SFX 8438 ėktis ekiasi/540 . 349

SFX 8439 Y 2
SFX 8439 ėkti ekia/541 . 349
SFX 8439 ėktis ekiasi/541 . 349

SFX 8440 Y 2
SFX 8440 ėkti ekia/542 . 349
SFX 8440 ėktis ekiasi/542 . 349

SFX 8441 Y 2
SFX 8441 ėkti ekia/543 . 349
SFX 8441 ėktis ekiasi/543 . 349

SFX 8442 Y 2
SFX 8442 ėkti ekia/544 . 349
SFX 8442 ėktis ekiasi/544 . 349

SFX 8443 Y 2
SFX 8443 ėkti ekia/545 . 349
SFX 8443 ėktis ekiasi/545 . 349

SFX 8444 Y 2
SFX 8444 ėkti ekia/546 . 349
SFX 8444 ėktis ekiasi/546 . 349

SFX 8445 Y 2
SFX 8445 ėkti ekia/547 . 349
SFX 8445 ėktis ekiasi/547 . 349

SFX 8446 Y 2
SFX 8446 ėkti ekia/548 . 349
SFX 8446 ėktis ekiasi/548 . 349

SFX 8456 Y 1
SFX 8456 ėkti ekie/549 . 349

SFX 8457 Y 1
SFX 8457 ėktis ekie/550 . 349

SFX 8458 Y 2
SFX 8458 ėkti ėkė/551 . 350
SFX 8458 ėktis ėkėsi/551 . 350

SFX 8459 Y 2
SFX 8459 ėkti ėkė/552 . 350
SFX 8459 ėktis ėkėsi/552 . 350

SFX 8460 Y 2
SFX 8460 ėkti ėkė/553 . 350
SFX 8460 ėktis ėkėsi/553 . 350

SFX 8464 Y 2
SFX 8464 sti sti/530 . 348
SFX 8464 stis stis/530 . 348

SFX 8465 Y 2
SFX 8465 sti sti/531 . 348
SFX 8465 stis stis/531 . 348

SFX 8466 Y 2
SFX 8466 sti sti/532 . 348
SFX 8466 stis stis/532 . 348

SFX 8467 Y 2
SFX 8467 sti sti/533 . 348
SFX 8467 stis stis/533 . 348

SFX 8468 Y 2
SFX 8468 sti sti/534 . 348
SFX 8468 stis stis/534 . 348

SFX 8469 Y 2
SFX 8469 sti sti/535 . 348
SFX 8469 stis stis/535 . 348

SFX 8470 Y 2
SFX 8470 sti sti/536 . 348
SFX 8470 stis stis/536 . 348

SFX 8471 Y 2
SFX 8471 sti sti/537 . 348
SFX 8471 stis stis/537 . 348

SFX 8472 Y 2
SFX 8472 sti sti/538 . 348
SFX 8472 stis stis/538 . 348

SFX 8473 Y 2
SFX 8473 sti sti/539 . 348
SFX 8473 stis stis/539 . 348

SFX 8484 Y 2
SFX 8484 sti džia/540 . 349
SFX 8484 stis džiasi/540 . 349

SFX 8485 Y 2
SFX 8485 sti džia/541 . 349
SFX 8485 stis džiasi/541 . 349

SFX 8486 Y 2
SFX 8486 sti džia/542 . 349
SFX 8486 stis džiasi/542 . 349

SFX 8487 Y 2
SFX 8487 sti džia/543 . 349
SFX 8487 stis džiasi/543 . 349

SFX 8488 Y 2
SFX 8488 sti džia/544 . 349
SFX 8488 stis džiasi/544 . 349

SFX 8489 Y 2
SFX 8489 sti džia/545 . 349
SFX 8489 stis džiasi/545 . 349

SFX 8490 Y 2
SFX 8490 sti džia/546 . 349
SFX 8490 stis džiasi/546 . 349

SFX 8491 Y 2
SFX 8491 sti džia/547 . 349
SFX 8491 stis džiasi/547 . 349

SFX 8492 Y 2
SFX 8492 sti džia/548 . 349
SFX 8492 stis džiasi/548 . 349

SFX 8502 Y 1
SFX 8502 sti die/549 . 349

SFX 8503 Y 1
SFX 8503 stis die/550 . 349

SFX 8504 Y 2
SFX 8504 sti do/551 . 350
SFX 8504 stis dosi/551 . 350

SFX 8505 Y 2
SFX 8505 sti do/552 . 350
SFX 8505 stis dosi/552 . 350

SFX 8506 Y 2
SFX 8506 sti do/553 . 350
SFX 8506 stis dosi/553 . 350
